North Carolina statutes. Chapter 160A. Cities and Towns.
Article 20. Interlocal Cooperation.

Part 1. Joint Exercise of Powers.

§ 160A-460.
Definitions.

The words defined in this section shall have the meanings indicated when used in this Part:

“Undertaking” means the joint exercise by two or more units of local government, or the contractual exercise by one unit for one or more other units, of any power, function, public enterprise, right, privilege, or immunity of local government.

“Unit,” or “unit of local government” means a county, city, consolidated city-county, local board of education, sanitary district, facility authority created under Part 4 of this Article, special district created under Article 43 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes, or other local political subdivision, authority, or agency of local government.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1975, c. 821, s. 4; 1979, c. 774, s. 1; 1981, c. 641; 1995, c. 458, s. 3; 2009-527, s. 2(f).

Local Modification.

Cherokee, Graham, Jackson and Swain: 1973, c. 1406.

Cross References.

As to application of this Part to joint construction of buildings by counties, cities or other units of local government, see

G.S. 153A-164

.

As to authority of counties under this Part, see also

G.S. 153A-212

.

As to power of county to take action under the provisions of this Part, see

G.S. 153A-445

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-527, s. 2(f), effective August 27, 2009, inserted “special district created under Article 43 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes,” in subdivision (2).

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Local boards of education have authority to make agreements establishing self-insurance program,

provided (1) the contracts establishing such program contain the provisions required by

G.S. 160A-464

, and (2) the contracts incorporate certain limitations set forth in

G.S. 115C-42

and 115C-43. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Gene Causby, Executive Director, North Carolina School Boards Association, 55 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 77 (1986).

§ 160A-461.
Interlocal cooperation authorized.

Any unit of local government in this State and any one or more other units of local government in this State or any other state (to the extent permitted by the laws of the other state) may enter into contracts or agreements with each other in order to execute any undertaking. The contracts and agreements shall be of reasonable duration, as determined by the participating units, and shall be ratified by resolution of the governing board of each unit spread upon its minutes.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1.

§ 160A-462.
Joint agencies.

Units agreeing to an undertaking may establish a joint agency charged with any or all of the responsibility for the undertaking. The units may confer on the joint agency any power, duty, right, or function needed for the execution of the undertaking, except that legal title to all real property necessary to the undertaking shall be held by the participating units individually, or jointly as tenants in common, in such manner and proportion as they may determine.

The participating units may appropriate funds to the joint agency on the basis of an annual budget recommended by the agency and submitted to the governing board of each unit for approval.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1.

Local Modification.

(As to subsection (a)) Clay County: 2003-127, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to transfer of ownership of provisionally approved septic tanks and innovative septic tank systems to joint agency in certain counties and inspection fees in those counties, see

G.S. 130A-343.1

.

§ 160A-463.
Personnel.

The units may agree that any joint agency established under

G.S. 160A-462

shall appoint the officers, agents, and employees necessary to execute the undertaking, or that the units jointly shall appoint these personnel, or that one of the units shall appoint the personnel with their services contracted for by the other units or by the joint agency. If the units determine that one unit shall appoint the personnel, the agreement shall provide that the jurisdiction, authority, rights, privileges, and immunities (including coverage under the workers’ compensation laws) which the officers, agents, and employees of the appointing unit enjoy within the territory of that unit shall also be enjoyed by them outside its territory when they are acting pursuant to the agreement and within the scope of their authority or the course of their employment.

When the subject of an undertaking is a sovereign function of government, the exercise of which has been delegated to an officer of each participating unit, the agreement may provide that one officer shall exercise the function for all the participating units, with all of the powers, duties, and obligations that an officer exercising the function in a single unit would have.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1991, c. 636, s. 3.

§ 160A-464.
Provisions of the agreement.

Any contract or agreement establishing an undertaking shall specify:

The purpose or purposes of the contract or agreement;

The duration of the agreement;

If a joint agency is established, its composition, organization, and nature, together with the powers conferred on it;

The manner of appointing the personnel necessary to the execution of the undertaking;

The method of financing the undertaking, including the apportionment of costs and revenues;

The formula for ownership of real property involved in the undertaking, and procedures for the disposition of such property when the contract or agreement expires or is terminated;

Methods for amending the contract or agreement;

Methods for terminating the contract or agreement;

Any other necessary or proper matter.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Local boards of education have authority to make agreements establishing self-insurance program,

provided (1) the contracts establishing such program contain the provisions required by

G.S. 160A-464

, and (2) the contracts incorporate certain limitations set forth in

G.S. 115C-42

and

G.S. 115C-43

. See Opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Gene Causby, Executive Director, North Carolina School Boards Association, 55 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 77 (1986).

Local boards of education may enter into interlocal agreements to form the North Carolina School Boards Trust.

See opinion of Attorney General to Edwin Dunlap, Jr., Executive Director, North Carolina School Boards Association, 2002 N.C. AG LEXIS 12 (2/20/02).

§ 160A-465.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 774, s. 2.

§ 160A-466.
Revenue and expenditures for joint undertakings.

When two or more units of local government are engaged in a joint undertaking, they may enter into agreements regarding financing, expenditures, and revenues related to the joint undertaking. Funds collected by any participating unit of government may be transferred to and expended by any other unit of government in a manner consistent with the agreement. An agreement regarding expenses and revenues may be of reasonable duration not to exceed 99 years.

History.

2003-417, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to local development act of 1925, see

G.S. 158-7.1

et seq.

§§ 160A-467 through 160A-469.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 2. Regional Councils of Governments.

§ 160A-470.
Creation of regional councils; definition of “unit of local government”.

Any two or more units of local government may create a regional council of governments by adopting identical concurrent resolutions to that effect in accordance with the provisions and procedures of this Part. To the extent permitted by the laws of its state, a local government in a state adjoining North Carolina may participate in regional councils of governments organized under this Part to the same extent as if it were located in this State. The concurrent resolutions creating a regional council of governments, and any amendments thereto, will be referred to in this Part as the “charter” of the regional council.

For the purposes of this Part, “unit of local government” means a county, city, or consolidated city-county.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1973, c. 426, s. 71.

Cross References.

As to power of county to take action under the provisions of this Part, see

G.S. 153A-445

.

Commerce Nonprofits/Reporting Requirements.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 11.2(a), (b), provides: “(a) The entities listed in subsection (b) of this section shall do the following for each year that State funds are expended:

“(1) By September 1 of each year, and more frequently as requested, report to the chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources; the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources; the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Agriculture, Natural, and Economic Resources; and the Fiscal Research Division on prior State fiscal year program activities, objectives, and accomplishments and prior State fiscal year itemized expenditures and fund sources. If State funds are used to provide matching funds for competitive grants from the federal government or a nongovernmental entity, the report should include a list and description of the grants that are awarded.

“(2) Provide to the chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources; the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources; the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Agriculture, Natural, and Economic Resources; and the Fiscal Research Division a copy of the entity's annual audited financial statement within 30 days of issuance of the statement.

“(b) The following entities shall comply with the requirements of subsection (a) of this section:

“(1) North Carolina Biotechnology Center.

“(2) High Point Market Authority.

“(3) RTI International.”

For prior similar provisions, see Session Laws 2011-145, s. 14.10(a)-(c), and Session Laws 2013-360, s. 15.25.

§ 160A-471.
Membership.

Each unit of local government initially adopting a concurrent resolution under

G.S. 160A-470

shall become a member of the regional council. Thereafter, any local government may join the regional council by ratifying its charter and by being admitted by a majority vote of the existing members. All of the rights and privileges of membership in a regional council of governments shall be exercised on behalf of its member governments by their delegates to the council.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1973, c. 426, s. 72.

§ 160A-472.
Contents of charter.

The charter of a regional council of governments shall:

Specify the name of the council;

Establish the powers, duties, and functions that it may exercise and perform;

Establish the number of delegates to represent the member governments, fix their terms of office, provide methods for filling vacancies, and prescribe the compensation and allowances, if any, to be paid to delegates;

Set out the method of determining the financial support that will be given to the council by each member government;

Establish a method for amending the charter, and for dissolving the council and liquidating its assets and liabilities.

In addition, the charter may, but need not, contain rules and regulations for the conduct of council business and any other matter pertaining to the organization, powers, and functioning of the council that the member governments deem appropriate.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1.

§ 160A-473.
Organization of council.

Upon its creation, a regional council shall meet at a time and place agreed upon by its member governments and shall organize by electing a chairman and any other officers that the charter may specify or the delegates may deem advisable. The council shall then adopt bylaws for the conduct of its business. All meetings of the council shall be open to the public.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1.

§ 160A-474.
Withdrawal from council.

Any member government may withdraw from a regional council at the end of any fiscal year by giving at least 60 days’ written notice to each of the other members. Withdrawal of a member government shall not dissolve the council if at least two members remain.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1.

§ 160A-475.
Specific powers of council.

The charter may confer on the regional council any of the following powers:

To apply for, accept, receive, and dispense funds and grants made available to it by the State of North Carolina or any agency thereof, the United States of America or any agency thereof, any unit of local government (whether or not a member of the council), and any private or civic agency.

To employ personnel.

To contract with consultants.

To contract with the State of North Carolina, any other state, the United States of America, or any agency thereof, for services.

To study regional governmental problems, including matters affecting health, safety, welfare, education, recreation, economic conditions, regional planning, and regional development.

To promote cooperative arrangements and coordinated action among its member governments.

To make recommendations for review and action to its member governments and other public agencies which perform functions within the region in which its member governments are located.

(7a)

For the purpose of meeting the regional council’s office space and program needs, to acquire real property by purchase, gift, or otherwise, and to improve that property. The regional council may pledge real property as security for indebtedness used to finance acquisition of that property or for improvements to that real property, subject to approval by the Local Government Commission as required under

G.S. 159-153

. A regional council may not exercise the power of eminent domain.

(7b)

To carry out the powers, duties, and responsibilities granted pursuant to Chapter 157 of the General Statutes except the power of eminent domain. This subdivision does not apply to cities with a population of greater than 250,000 according to the latest federal decennial census.

(See Editor’s Note) Any other powers that are exercised or capable of exercise by its member governments and desirable for dealing with problems of mutual concern to the extent such powers are specifically delegated to it from time to time by resolution of the governing board of each of its member governments which are affected thereby, provided, that no regional council of governments shall have the authority to construct or purchase buildings, or acquire title to real property, except for the purposes permitted under subdivision (7a) of this section or in order to exercise the authority granted by Chapter 260 of the Session Laws of 1979.

(See Editor’s Note) Any other powers that are exercised or capable of exercise by its member governments and desirable for dealing with problems of mutual concern to the extent such powers are specifically delegated to it from time to time by resolution of the governing board of each of its member governments which are affected thereby, provided, that no regional council of governments shall have the authority to construct or purchase buildings, or acquire title to real property, except for the purposes permitted under subdivision (7a) of this section or in order to exercise the authority granted by Chapter 260 of the Session Laws of 1979, or the powers, duties, and responsibilities granted to the regional council pursuant to Chapter 157 of the General Statutes. Nothing in this subdivision permits a regional council to exercise the power of eminent domain. This subdivision does not apply to cities with a population of greater than 250,000 according to the latest federal decennial census.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1975, c. 517, ss. 1, 2; 1979, c. 902; 2005-290, s. 1; 2006-211, s. 1; 2017-178, ss. 2, 3.

§ 160A-476.
Fiscal affairs.

Each unit of local government having membership in a regional council may appropriate funds to the council from any legally available revenues. Services of personnel, use of equipment and office space, and other services may be made available to the council by its member governments as a part of their financial support.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1973, c. 426, s. 73.

§ 160A-477.
Reports.

Each regional council shall prepare and distribute to its member governments and to the public an annual report of its activities including a financial statement.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1.

§ 160A-478.
Powers granted are supplementary.

The powers granted to cities and counties by this Article are supplementary to any powers heretofore or hereafter granted by any other general law, local act, or city charter for the same or similar purposes.

History.

1971, c. 698, s. 1.

Part 3. Regional Sports Authorities.

§ 160A-479.
Creation of authority; definition.

Any two or more units of local government may create a regional sports authority by adopting identical concurrent resolutions to that effect in accordance with the provisions of this Part. The concurrent resolutions creating a regional sports authority, and any amendments thereto will be referred to in this Part as the “charter” of the regional sports authority. For the purposes of this Part, “unit of local government” means a county, city or consolidated city-county.

Any regional sports authority created pursuant to this Part shall be a body corporate and politic.

History.

1989, c. 780, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “If At First You Don’t Succeed: Constitutional Challenges to Second Execution Attempts,”
see 53 Wake Forest L. Rev. 211 (2018).

For article, “Ultimate Discrimination?: Sunday Play, Sports Schedules, and Evaluating the Effectiveness of Anti-Discrimination Laws,” see 97 N.C.L. Rev. 933 (2019).

§ 160A-479.1.
Purpose of the authority.

The purpose of a regional sports authority shall be to research, design, construct, provide, finance, operate, improve, and maintain facilities for public participation and enjoyment of sports, fitness, health and recreational activities of as many different types and kinds as possible. The primary purpose of any and all such facilities shall be the conduct of sports events but use of these facilities need not be limited to such.

History.

1989, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 160A-479.2.
Jurisdiction of the authority.

The territorial jurisdiction of any authority created pursuant to this Part shall be coterminous with the boundaries of the respective units of local government creating and participating in the authority.

The jurisdiction of any authority created pursuant to this Part shall include any and all currently existing public sports facilities operating within its territorial jurisdiction to the extent that any person or governmental entity owning or controlling such facilities has reached mutual and written agreement with an authority for the operation and maintenance of such facilities by the authority.

The jurisdiction of an authority shall also include any and all new public sports facilities within the regional authority’s territorial jurisdiction developed specifically for operation and maintenance by an authority with the agreement of an authority.

History.

1989, c. 780, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “If At First You Don’t Succeed: Constitutional Challenges to Second Execution Attempts,”
see 53 Wake Forest L. Rev. 211 (2018).

§ 160A-479.3.
Membership.

Each unit of local government initially adopting a concurrent resolution under

G.S. 160A-479

shall become a member of the regional authority. Thereafter, any local government may join the regional authority by ratifying its charter and by being admitted by a majority vote of the existing members. All of the rights and privileges of membership in a regional sports authority shall be exercised on behalf of its member governments by their delegates to the authority.

History.

1989, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 160A-479.4.
Contents of charter.

The charter of a regional sports authority shall:

Specify the name of the authority;

Establish the powers, duties, and functions that it may exercise and perform;

Establish the number of delegates to represent the member governments, fix their terms of office, provide methods for filling vacancies, and prescribe the compensation and allowances, if any, to be paid to delegates;

Set out the method of determining the financial support that will be given to the authority by each member government;

Establish a method for amending the charter, and for dissolving the authority and liquidating its assets and liabilities.

In addition, the charter may, but need not, contain rules and regulations for the conduct of authority business and any other matter pertaining to the organization, powers, and functioning of the authority that the member governments deem appropriate.

History.

1989, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 160A-479.5.
Organization of authority.

Upon its creation, a regional sports authority shall meet at a time and place agreed upon by its member governments and shall organize by electing a chairman and any other officers that the charter may specify or the delegates may deem advisable. The authority shall then adopt bylaws for the conduct of its business. All meetings of the authority shall be open to the public.

History.

1989, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 160A-479.6.
Withdrawal from authority.

Any member government may withdraw from a regional sports authority at the end of any fiscal year by giving at least 60 days’ written notice to each of the other members. A withdrawal does not affect the validity of any revenue bonds or notes, and any revenue from sports facilities in the area of the member government that was pledged in payment of bonds or notes issued before the date of notice of withdrawal remains pledged for that purpose until the bonds and notes and interest on the bonds and notes have been paid. Withdrawal of a member government shall not dissolve the authority if at least two members remain.

History.

1989, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 160A-479.7.
Powers of authority.

The charter may confer on the regional sports authority any or all of the following powers:

To apply for, accept, receive, and dispense funds and grants made available to it by the State of North Carolina or any agency thereof, the United States of America or any agency thereof, any unit of local government (whether or not a member of the authority), and any private or civic agency;

To employ personnel;

To contract with consultants;

To contract with the State of North Carolina, any other state, the United States of America, or any agency thereof, for services;

To adopt bylaws for the regulation of the affairs and the conduct of its business, and to prescribe rules, regulations and policies in connection with the performance of its functions and duties, not inconsistent with this Part;

To adopt an official seal and alter the same at pleasure;

To acquire and maintain an administrative building or office at such place or places as it may determine, which building or office may be used or owned alone or together with any municipalities, corporations, associations or persons under such terms and provisions for sharing costs and otherwise as may be determined;

To sue and be sued in its own name, and to plead and be impleaded;

To receive, administer, and comply with the conditions and requirements respecting any gift, grant, or donation of any property or money;

To acquire by purchase, lease, gift, or otherwise, or to obtain options for the acquisition of, any property, real or personal, improved or unimproved, including an interest in land less than the fee thereof;

To sell, lease, exchange, transfer, or otherwise dispose of, or to grant options for any such purposes with respect to, any real or personal property or interest therein;

To pledge, assign, mortgage, or otherwise grant a security interest in any real or personal property or interest therein, including the right and power to pledge, assign, or otherwise grant a security interest in any money, rents, charges, or other revenues and any proceeds derived by an authority from any and all sources;

To issue revenue bonds of the authority to finance regional sports and recreational facilities, including support facilities, to refund any revenue bonds or notes issued by the authority, whether or not in advance of their maturity or earliest redemption date, or to provide funds for other corporate purposes of the authority;

With the approval of the unit of local government’s chief administrative official, to use officers, employees, agents, and facilities of the unit of local government for such purposes and upon such terms as may be mutually agreeable;

To develop and make data, plans, information, surveys, and studies of public sports and recreation facilities within the territorial jurisdiction of an authority, to prepare and make recommendations in regard thereto;

To study and plan for new and improved major regional sports and recreational facilities including but not limited to arenas, stadia, gymnasia, natatoria, pitches, fields, watercourses, and other areas for the conduct of sports and recreational activities. These facilities should be of such sizes and in such locations that they will be adequate to serve the population of the entire jurisdiction of the authority (and beyond) to the extent possible;

To design any new such facilities so they include such equipment and design that efficiency, cost, accessibility, utility, and usability of such facilities will be maximized;

To have sports facilities grouped into complexes or separated as an authority may see fit, and such facilities may include ancillary support facilities including but not limited to those for administration, sports science, sports medicine, training, museums, meeting rooms and conference centers, accommodations, food services, retail shops, theatres, video services, schools, and educational services.

To operate the facilities in such a way as to make them as accessible as possible for rental and use by the public while balancing the need for as many of the facilities as possible (particularly any arenas and stadia) to operate annually without a deficit (exclusive of any debt service);

To operate such facilities together with the State, any entity of the State, or local government as appropriate to maintain a high profile and promotional value for North Carolina and the region encompassed by an authority and to attract as many major regional, national, and international tournaments, events, championships training centers, training camps, and headquarters for the governance of various sports, associations, and events as reasonable and possible;

To generate a significant and continuing positive economic impact on the region and State through the construction and operation of facilities and conduct of events and activities within the facilities;

To set and collect such fees and charges for use of such facilities as is reasonable to offset operating costs of said facilities and yet enable said facilities to be affordable to and used by as much of the regional and State population as possible;

To apply to the appropriate agencies of the State, the United States or any state thereof, and to any other proper agency for such permits, licenses, certificates or approvals as may be necessary, and to construct, maintain and operate projects in accordance with such licenses, permits, certificates or approvals in the same manner as any other person or operating unit of any other person;

To employ engineers, architects, attorneys, real estate counselors, appraisers, financial advisors and such other consultants and employees as may be required in the judgment of an authority and to fix and pay their compensation from funds available to an authority therefor and to select and retain subject to approval of the Local Government Commission, the financial consultants, underwriters and bond attorneys to be associated with the issuance of any revenue bonds and to pay for services rendered by underwriters, financial consultants, or bond attorneys out of the proceeds of any such issue with regard to which the services were performed; and

To do all acts and things necessary, convenient, or desirable to carry out the purposes, and to exercise the powers granted to an authority herein.

The charter may not confer the following powers on the regional sports authority:

To issue general obligation bonds or otherwise incur a debt that is secured by the full faith and/or credit of the authority, a member government of the authority, or the State.

To levy a property tax or other tax.

To acquire property by eminent domain.

History.

1989, c. 780, s. 1; 2007-495, s. 19.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-495, s. 19, effective August 30, 2007, made minor stylistic changes in subdivision (a)(16).

§ 160A-479.8.
Fiscal accountability.

A Regional Sports Authority is a public authority subject to the provisions of Chapter 159 of the General Statutes of North Carolina.

History.

1989, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 160A-479.9.
Funds.

The establishment and operation of an authority as herein authorized are governmental functions and constitute a public purpose, and the State of North Carolina and any unit of local government may appropriate funds to support the establishment and operation of an authority.

The State of North Carolina and any unit of local government may also dedicate, sell, convey, donate or lease any of their interests in any property to an authority.

History.

1989, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 160A-479.10.
Controlling provisions.

Insofar as the provisions of this Part are not consistent with the provisions of any other law, public or private, the provisions of this Part shall be controlling.

History.

1989, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 160A-479.11.
Conflicts of interest of public officials.

Members, officers, and employees of any authority created under this Part shall be subject to the provisions of

G.S. 14-234

.

History.

1989, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 160A-479.12.
Issuance of revenue bonds and notes.

The Local Government Revenue Bond Act, G.S. Chapter 159, Article 5, governs the issuance of revenue bonds by an authority. G.S. Chapter 159, Article 9, governs the issuance of notes in anticipation of the sale of revenue bonds.

History.

1989, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 160A-479.13.
Acquisition of property.

In addition to the powers hereinbefore granted, an authority may, in its charter, be granted continuing power to acquire, by gift, grant, devise, exchange, purchase, lease with or without option to purchase, or any other lawful method, the fee or any lesser interest in real or personal property for use by an authority.

History.

1989, c. 780, s. 1; 2011-284, s. 119.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-284, s. 119, effective June 24, 2011, deleted “bequest” following “devise.”

§ 160A-479.14.
Tax exemption.

The property of an authority, both real and personal, its acts, activities and income shall be exempt from any tax or tax obligation; in the event of any lease of authority property, or other arrangement which amounts to a leasehold interest, to a private party, this exemption shall not apply to the value of such leasehold interest nor shall it apply to the income of the lessee.

Otherwise, however, for the purpose of taxation, when property of an authority is leased to private parties solely for the purpose of an authority, the acts and activities of an authority for the purpose of exemption of the lessee shall be considered as the acts and activities of the private parties.

The interest on revenue bonds or notes issued by an authority shall be exempt from State taxes.

History.

1989, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 160A-479.15.
Removal and relocation of utility structures.

An authority may require any public utility, railroad, or other public service corporation owning or operating any installations, structures, equipment, apparatus, appliances or facilities in, upon, under, over, across or along any land or facility where an authority has the right to own, construct, operate or maintain its facilities to remove or relocate such installation, structures, equipment, apparatus, appliances or facilities from their location.

If the owner or operator thereof fails or refuses to remove or relocate them, an authority may proceed to do so.

An authority may provide the necessary new locations or an authority may also acquire the necessary new locations by purchase or otherwise, but not by eminent domain.

An authority shall reimburse the public utility, railroad or other public service corporation, for the cost of relocations which shall be the entire amount paid or incurred by the utility properly attributable thereto after deducting the cost of any increase in the service capacity of the new installations, structures, equipment, apparatus, appliances or facilities and any salvage value derived from the old installations, structures, equipment, apparatus or appliances.

History.

1989, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 160A-479.16.
Advances.

Any member government unit may make advances, from any moneys that may be available for such purpose, in connection with the creation of the authority and to provide for the preliminary expenses of such authority. Any such advances may be repaid to such participating units of local government from the proceeds of the revenue bonds issued by such authority, if capital in nature, or from other available funds of the authority.

History.

1989, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 160A-479.17.
Annexation.

The annexation by a member government which is a city of areas lying outside of the territorial jurisdiction of the authority shall make such annexed area a part of the territorial jurisdiction of the authority, and such area shall be subject to all debts and all obligations thereof.

History.

1989, c. 780, s. 1.

§ 160A-480.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 4. Facility Authorities.

§ 160A-480.1.
Short title.

This Part is the “Facility Authority Act” and may be cited by that name.

History.

1995, c. 458, s. 1.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

The General Assembly did not restrict boards of county commissioners and city councils from appointing their employees, agents or officers, although the General Assembly prohibited these bodies from appointing themselves to a facility authority. See opinion of Attorney General to George B. Daniel, Chairman, Legal Bylaws Committee, The Centennial Authority, 1999 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 3 (1/28/99).

§ 160A-480.2.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Part:

Authority. — A Facility Authority.

Credit facility. — An agreement with a banking institution, an insurance institution, an investment institution, or other financial institution located inside or outside the United States of America that provides for prompt payment, whether at maturity, presentment, or tender for purchase, redemption, or acceleration, of part or all of the principal or purchase price, redemption premium, if any, and interest on a bond or note issued by the Authority and for repayment of the institution.

Member. — A person appointed to a facility authority.

Par formula. — A provision or formula to make periodic adjustments in the interest rate of a bond or note, including:

A provision for an adjustment to keep the purchase price of the bond or note in the open market as close to par as possible.

A provision for an adjustment based on one or more percentages of a prime rate or base rate that may vary or apply for specified periods of time.

Any other provision that does not materially and adversely affect the financial position of the Authority and the marketing of the bonds or notes at a reasonable interest cost to the Authority.

Regional facility. — A facility consisting of an arena, coliseum, or other buildings or both, or areas where sports, fitness, health, recreational, entertainment, or cultural activities can be conducted. The facility may be composed of buildings grouped into complexes or separated from each other and may include ancillary support facilities, such as those for administration, sports science, sports medicine, training, museums, meeting rooms and conference centers, accommodations, parking, and food services. The facility should be designed to attract to the State as many major regional, national, and international tournaments, events, championships, training centers, training camps, and headquarters for the governance of various sports, associations, and events as possible. The regional facility shall be constructed on land owned by the State.

History.

1995, c. 458, s. 1.